Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.060

Director of the state system of community and technical colleges—Appointment—Term—Qualifications—Salary and travel expenses—Duties.

A director of the state system of community and technical colleges shall be appointed by the college board and shall serve at the pleasure of the college board. The director shall be appointed with due regard to the applicant's fitness and background in education, and knowledge of and recent practical experience in the field of educational administration particularly in institutions beyond the high school level. The college board may also take into consideration an applicant's proven management background even though not particularly in the field of education.

The director shall devote his or her time to the duties of his or her office and shall not have any direct pecuniary interest in or any stock or bonds of any business connected with or selling supplies to the field of education within this state, in keeping with chapter 42.52 RCW.

The director shall receive a salary to be fixed by the college board and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the discharge of his or her official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

The director shall be the executive officer of the college board and serve as its secretary and under its supervision shall administer the provisions of this chapter and the rules and orders established thereunder and all other laws of the state. The director shall attend, but not vote at, all meetings of the college board. The director shall be in charge of offices of the college board and responsible to the college board for the preparation of reports and the collection and dissemination of data and other public information relating to the state system of community and technical colleges. At the direction of the college board, the director shall, together with the chair of the college board, execute all contracts entered into by the college board.

The director shall, with the approval of the college board: (1) Employ necessary assistant directors of major staff divisions who shall serve at the director's pleasure on such terms and conditions as the director determines, and (2) subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW the director shall, with the approval of the college board, appoint and employ such field and office assistants, clerks and other employees as may be required and authorized for the proper discharge of the functions of the college board and for whose services funds have been appropriated.

The board may, by written order filed in its office, delegate to the director any of the powers and duties vested in or imposed upon it by this chapter. Such delegated powers and duties may be exercised by the director in the name of the college board.

[ 2011 c 336 s 738; 1994 c 154 s 306; 1991 c 238 s 31; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 75; 1973 1st ex.s. c 46 s 8; 1973 c 62 s 14; 1969 ex.s. c 261 s 20; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.060. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 154: See RCW 42.52.904.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 46: See note following RCW 28B.10.704.

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 261: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.